Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-245
Town officer; retirement; records; transfer.

It shall be the duty of every person retiring from a town office to deliver to his successor in office all the records, books, papers, money, and property belonging to such office held by him.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 43, p. 143;

R.S.1913, § 1029;

C.S.1922, § 931;

C.S.1929, § 26-245;

R.S.1943, § 23-245.

Every person retiring from town office is required to deliver the records and property of his office to his successor. Town of Denver v. Myers, 63 Neb. 107, 88 N.W. 191 (1901).